Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.190

Procedure on contingent and disputed claim.

If there be any contingent or disputed claim against the estate, the amount thereof, or such part thereof as the holder would be entitled to, if the claim were established or absolute, shall be paid into the court, where it shall remain to be paid over to the party when he or she shall become entitled thereto; or if he or she fails to establish his or her claim, to be paid over or distributed as the circumstances of the case may require.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2072; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.190. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 179; RRS s 1549; prior: Code 1881 s 1567; 1854 p 298 s 189.]